California, session 20252026, SB1107.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17250.20 of the Education Code is amended to read:17250.20. (a) (1) A school district, with approval of its governing board, may procure design-build contracts for projects in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), awarding the contract to either the low bid or the best value.(2) A On or before December 31, 2031, a school district, with approval of its governing board, may procure multiple design-build contracts for comparable shade structure projects at various sites, including, but not limited to, shade structure projects, bundled through a single solicitation, even if the values of any individual projects are less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), ($1,000,000) but do not exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total value of the projects exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), awarding the bundled contracts to either the low bid or the best value. Each contract awarded through a bundled solicitation shall be a separate contract for a single project with an individual contract value, scope of work, location, schedule, design, and construction. A contract entered into on or before December 31, 2031, may be completed after that date.(b) The school district shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the school district relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to each school district entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter.(c) This chapter shall apply to bid requests issued on or after July 1, 2016.SEC. 2. Section 17671 of the Education Code is amended to read:17671. (a) Projects solely for (1) the installation of shade structures integrated with playground equipment or (2) freestanding, open-sided shade structures, that are included on the Division of the State Architect pre-checked designs list where the adjusted construction cost exceeds the valuation threshold for alterations or additions on a school district, county office of education, charter school, or community college campus shall have the cost of compliance for path of travel improvements required by Section 202.4 of Chapter 11B of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations limited to 20 percent of the adjusted construction cost of the shade structure project.(b) For purposes of this section, “adjusted construction cost” has the same meaning as in Section 202 of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.